Wisconsin, session 2025, AB241.
do enact as follows:AB241,1bSection 1b. 106.015 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 106.015 (1m) and amended to read:106.015 (1m) Except as provided in sub. subs. (1s) and (2), the department may not prescribe, enforce, or authorize, whether through the promulgation of a rule, the issuance of a general or special order, the approval of an apprenticeship program or apprentice contract, or otherwise, a ratio of apprentices to journeyworkers for apprenticeship programs or apprentice contracts that requires more than one journeyworker for each apprentice in any trade, craft, or business that is not a construction trade.AB241,1eSection 1e. 106.015 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:106.015 (1g) In this section, “construction trade” means a trade, craft, or business that the department has, for purposes of its approval of apprenticeship programs under this chapter, identified as being a construction trade.AB241,1gSection 1g. 106.015 (1s) of the statutes is created to read:106.015 (1s) Except as provided in subs. (1m) and (2), the department may not prescribe, enforce, or authorize, whether through the promulgation of a rule, the issuance of a general or special order, the approval of an apprenticeship program or apprentice contract, or otherwise, a ratio of apprentices to journeyworkers for apprenticeship programs or apprentice contracts that requires more than one journeyworker for 2 apprentices in a construction trade.AB241,1rSection 1r. 106.015 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:106.015 (2) The prohibition prohibitions under sub. (1) does subs. (1m) and (1s) do not apply with respect to apprentices whose employment is governed by a collective bargaining agreement. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab241 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab241 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB241 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB241 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB241: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting